Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-211
Elections; notice.

The village clerk shall give public notice of the time and place of holding each village election, the notice to be given not less than ten nor more than twenty days previous to the election in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in the village.

Laws 1879, § 50, p. 205;

R.S.1913, § 5061;

C.S.1922, § 4233;

C.S.1929, § 17-211;

R.S.1943, § 17-211;

Laws 1959, c. 60, § 54, p. 272;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 74.